Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.310

Automated teller machines and night depositories security.

Chapter 19.174 RCW applies to automated teller machines and night depositories regulated under this title.

[ 1993 c 324 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 324: See RCW 19.174.900.